North Carolina, session 2025, SB812.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Revenue the sum of four million four hundred thousand dollars ($4,400,000) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to continue and expand the Department's tax
fraud analysis contract through the Government Data Analytics Center (GDAC). These funds
shall be used to fund detection analytics, software, information reporting, collections case
management, collections optimization, managed services, and technical infrastructure. The
Department shall continue to coordinate with GDAC and utilize the subject matter expertise and
technical infrastructure available through existing GDAC public-private partnerships for fraud
detection and analytics infrastructure.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S812-v-1*